Utah statutes.
63G-1-703.   Display of POW/MIA flag.

(1)  In any place at the capitol hill complex where the United States flag is displayed out of doors, the entity responsible for the display of the United States flag shall display the POW/MIA flag, in the manner described in Subsection (2), from sunrise to sunset on the following days:

(a)  Armed Forces Day, the third Saturday in May;

(b)  Memorial Day, the last Monday in May;

(c)  Flag Day, June 14;

(d)  Independence Day, July 4;

(e)  Veteran's Day, November 11; and

(f)  National POW/MIA Recognition Day, the third Friday in September.

(2)  When displaying the POW/MIA flag under Subsection (1), the entity responsible to display the flag shall fly or hang the POW/MIA flag as follows:

(a)  if the United States flag and the POW/MIA flag are attached to the same flag pole, by placing the POW/MIA flag directly under the United States flag; or

(b)  if the United States flag and the POW/MIA flag are displayed near each other, but not on the same flag pole, by placing the top of the POW/MIA flag below the top of the United States flag.



Enacted by Chapter 90, 2013 General Session

